Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3502.01
Radon mitigation program; authorized.

The department may establish an alternative maximum contaminant level for radon in drinking water by establishing a multimedia radon mitigation program as provided under federal law which may include public education, testing, training, technical assistance, remediation grants, and loan or incentive programs. The purpose of the radon mitigation program shall be to achieve health risk reduction benefits equal to or greater than the health risk reduction benefits that would be achieved if each public water system in the state complied with the maximum contaminant level of three hundred picocuries per liter.

Laws 2001, LB 668, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 565.